Utah statutes.
11-17-17.   State universities granted same powers as municipalities and
counties -- Authority to issue bonds.
(1)  The State Board of Regents may, on behalf of the University of Utah and
Utah State University exercise all powers granted to municipalities and
counties pursuant to this chapter, except as provided in Subsection (2).
(2)  The board may not issue bonds in excess of $10,000,000 in any one fiscal
year under this chapter on behalf of either institution as the borrower
without prior approval from the Legislature.
(3)  Refunding bonds are exempt from the requirements of Subsection (2) if:
(a)  the bonds are issued to reduce debt service costs; and
(b)  the refunding bonds mature during the same time frame as the original
obligation.
